Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
STREET-ROD VEHICLES

42-12-201. Inspections - street-rod vehicles.

When an inspector performs a vehicle identification number inspection on a street-rod vehicle, the inspector shall accept the serial number of such street-rod vehicle as the vehicle's identification number or, if the street-rod vehicle has frame and body identification numbers that do not match or is reconstructed from salvage parts, other vehicles, or reproduction parts, the inspector shall accept the special vehicle identification number assigned to such vehicle by the department by section 42-12-202 as the vehicle identification number.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 236, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-5-203 as it existed prior to 2011.

42-12-202. Assignment of a special vehicle identification number by the department.

The department may assign a special vehicle identification number to any street-rod vehicle whenever required by section 42-12-203 and to any vehicle or commercial vehicle whenever no vehicle identification number is found on the vehicle or whenever a vehicle identification number has been removed, changed, altered, or obliterated. The special number must be affixed to the vehicle or commercial vehicle in the manner and position determined by the department. The special number is the vehicle identification number required to be recorded by an inspector on the inspection form that is transmitted to the department, which shall register and title the motor vehicle using the special vehicle identification number.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 236, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-5-205 as it existed prior to 2011.

42-12-203. Identification number - title - street-rod vehicles.

When a person applies for a certificate of title for a street-rod vehicle, the department shall accept the serial number of the street-rod vehicle as its vehicle identification number or the special vehicle identification number assigned to such vehicle by the department under section 42-12-202.

A person who applies for a certificate of title for a street-rod vehicle having frame and body identification numbers that do not match the manufacturer's numbering system as being originally mated or that is reconstructed from salvage parts or other motor vehicles or reproduction parts shall furnish evidence of ownership, acceptable to the director, of such salvage parts, other motor vehicles, or reproduction components used in the reconstruction of such vehicle. In addition, the applicant shall furnish an affidavit stating the facts concerning the reconstruction and an affidavit of physical inspection that includes a computer check of the state and national compilations of wanted and stolen vehicles. The department may issue a special vehicle identification number and title the street-rod vehicle as a rebuilt vehicle. The model year and the year of manufacture that are listed on the certificate of title of a street-rod vehicle are the model year and the year of manufacture that the body of such vehicle resembles.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 236, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-108 as it existed prior to 2011.

42-12-204. Signal lamps and devices - street-rod vehicles and custom motor vehicles - definition.

As used in this section, "blue dot tail light" means a red lamp installed in the rear of a motor vehicle containing a blue or purple insert that is not more than one inch in diameter.

A street-rod vehicle or custom motor vehicle may use blue dot tail lights for stop lamps, rear turning indicator lamps, rear hazard lamps, and rear reflectors if the lamps comply with all requirements of part 2 of article 4 of this title.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 237, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-215.5 as it existed prior to 2011.